Massachusetts, session 194th, S1352.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 24 through 27, the definition of “Covered
business entity” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Covered business entity”, a business or trade whose workforce is comprised of 50 per
cent or more individuals that it contracts with or receives services from who are not employees
under the test set forth in section 2 of chapter 151A of the General Laws.
And by striking out, in lines 28 through 32, the definition of “Covered contract worker”
and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
of 2

“Covered contract worker”, an individual who is not an employee under the test set forth
in section 2 of chapter 151A of the General Laws and for whom an employer or covered business
entity is required to remit contributions to the Family and Employment Security Trust Fund
pursuant to section 6.
of 2